Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1721
Process for selecting design-builder and entering into contract.

The process for selecting a design-builder and entering into a design-build contract shall be in accordance with sections 37-1722 to 37-1725.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 22.